Wisconsin, session 2025, AB217.
do enact as follows:AB217,11Section 1. 59.52 (29) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 59.52 (29) (a) 1. and 2amended to read:AB217,2,7359.52 (29) (a) 1. All public work, including any contract for the construction, 4repair, remodeling, or improvement of any public work, building, or furnishing of 5supplies or material of any kind where the estimated cost of such work will exceed 6$25,000 the bidding threshold under par. (e) 1. a. shall be let by contract to the 7lowest responsible bidder.AB217,2,983. Any public work, the estimated cost of which does not exceed $25,000 the 9bidding threshold under par. (e) 1. a., shall be let as the board may direct.AB217,2,13104. If the estimated cost of any public work is between $5,000 the notice 11threshold under par. (e) 1. b. and $25,000 the bidding threshold under par. (e) 1. a., 12the board shall give a class 1 notice under ch. 985 before it contracts for the work or 13shall contract with a person qualified as a bidder under s. 66.0901 (2).AB217,2,18142. A contract, the estimated cost of which exceeds $25,000 the bidding 15threshold under par. (e) 1. a., shall be let and entered into under s. 66.0901, except 16that the board may by a three-fourths vote of all the members entitled to a seat 17provide that any class of public work or any part thereof may be done directly by the 18county without submitting the same for bids.AB217,3,219(c) 1. This subsection does not apply to public construction if the materials for 1such a the project are donated or if the labor for such a the project is provided by 2volunteers.AB217,3,53(d) This subsection does not apply to highway contracts which the county 4highway committee or the county highway commissioner is authorized by law to let 5or make, which shall be let or made under s. 83.04.AB217,26Section 2. 59.52 (29) (c) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB217,3,9759.52 (29) (c) 2. This subsection does not apply to the construction by a private 8person of an improvement that is donated to the county after the completion of 9construction.AB217,310Section 3. 59.52 (29) (c) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB217,3,121159.52 (29) (c) 3. This subsection does not apply to public work for the purpose 12of providing housing for persons placed on supervised release under s. 980.08.AB217,413Section 4. 59.52 (29) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB217,3,151459.52 (29) (e) 1. Beginning on the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 15inserts date}, the thresholds under par. (a) are the following:AB217,3,1616a. For general public works contract bidding, $50,000.AB217,3,1717b. For general public works contract notice, $10,000.AB217,3,22182. On the 5th year commencing after the effective date of this subdivision .... 19[LRB inserts date], and each subsequent 5th year, the thresholds under subd. 1. 20shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the U.S. 21consumer price index for the previous 5 years, as determined by the federal 22department of labor, rounded to the nearest multiple of $1,000.AB217,523Section 5. 60.47 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 60.47 (1) (am) and 24amended to read:AB217,4,3160.47 (1) (am) “Public contract” means a contract for the construction, 2execution, repair, remodeling or improvement of any public work or building or for 3the furnishing of materials or supplies, with an estimated cost greater than $5,000.AB217,64Section 6. 60.47 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB217,4,6560.47 (1) (ag) “Highway” means a public way or thoroughfare, including any 6bridges on the public way or thoroughfare.AB217,77Section 7. 60.47 (1) (as) of the statutes is created to read:AB217,4,9860.47 (1) (as) “Public highway contract” means a contract for the construction, 9execution, repair, remodeling, or improvement of a highway.AB217,810Section 8. 60.47 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB217,4,151160.47 (2) (a) No town may enter into a public contract with an estimated cost 12of more than $5,000 the notice threshold under sub. (2s) (a) 2. but not more than 13$25,000 the bidding threshold under sub. (2s) (a) 1. unless the town board, or a town 14official or employee designated by the town board, gives a class 1 notice under ch. 15985 before execution of that public contract.AB217,916Section 9. 60.47 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB217,4,211760.47 (2) (b) No town may enter into a public contract with a value of more 18than $25,000 the bidding threshold under sub. (2s) (a) 1. unless the town board, or 19a town official or employee designated by the town board, advertises for proposals to 20perform the terms of the public contract by publishing a class 2 notice under ch. 21985. The town board may provide for additional means of advertising for bids.AB217,1022Section 10. 60.47 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB217,5,102360.47 (2m) Public highway contracts. Notwithstanding sub. (2), and 24except as provided in subs. (4) and (5), no town may enter into a public highway 1contract with an estimated cost of more than the notice threshold under sub. (2s) (a) 24. but not more than the bidding threshold under sub. (2s) (a) 3. unless the town 3board, or a town official or employee designated by the town board, gives a class 1 4notice under ch. 985 before execution of that public highway contract. 5Notwithstanding sub. (2), and except as provided in subs. (4) and (5), no town may 6enter into a public highway contract with a value of more than the bidding 7threshold under sub. (2s) (a) 3., unless the town board, or a town official or employee 8designated by the town board, advertises for proposals to perform the terms of the 9public highway contract by publishing a class 2 notice under ch. 985. The town 10board may provide for additional means of advertising for bids.AB217,1111Section 11. 60.47 (2s) of the statutes is created to read:AB217,5,141260.47 (2s) Threshold amounts. (a) Beginning on the effective date of this 13paragraph .... [LRB inserts date}, the thresholds under subs. (2) and (2m) are the 14following:AB217,5,15151. For general public contract bidding, $50,000.AB217,5,16162. For general public contract notice, $10,000.AB217,5,17173. For public highway contract bidding, $25,000.AB217,5,18184. For public highway contract notice, $5,000.AB217,5,2319(b) On the 5th year commencing after the effective date of this paragraph .... 20[LRB inserts date], and each subsequent 5th year, the thresholds under par. (a) 21shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the U.S. 22consumer price index for the previous 5 years, as determined by the federal 23department of labor, rounded to the nearest multiple of $1,000.AB217,1224Section 12. 60.47 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB217,6,5160.47 (3) Contracts to lowest responsible bidder. The town board shall 2let a public contract or public highway contract, for which advertising for proposals 3is required under sub. (2) (b) or (2m) to the lowest responsible bidder. Section 466.0901 applies to public contracts or public highway contracts let under sub. subs. 5(2) (b) and (2m).AB217,136Section 13. 60.47 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB217,6,9760.47 (4) Contracts with governmental entities. This section does not 8apply to public contracts or public highway contracts entered into by a town with a 9municipality, as defined under s. 66.0301 (1) (a).AB217,1410Section 14. 60.47 (5) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB217,6,121160.47 (5) (title) Exception for emergencies and donated materials and 12labor certain donations.AB217,1513Section 15. 60.47 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 60.47 (5) (a) and 14amended to read:AB217,6,201560.47 (5) (a) This section is optional with respect to public contracts and 16public highway contracts for the repair and construction of public facilities when 17damage or threatened damage to the facility creates an emergency, as declared by 18resolution of the town board, that endangers the public health or welfare of the 19town. This subsection no longer applies when the town board declares that the 20emergency no longer exists.AB217,7,221(b) This section is optional with respect to a public contract or public highway 22contract if the materials related to the contract are donated or if the labor that is 1necessary to execute the public contract or public highway contract is provided by 2volunteers. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab217 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab217 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB217 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB217 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB217: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting